Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1647.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 3134. Possession, trafficking or importing a child sex doll.(a) Offenses defined.-- (1) A person commits the offense of possessing a child sex doll by intentionally or knowingly possessing a child sex doll.(2) A person commits the offense of trafficking a child sex doll by knowingly manufacturing, distributing, selling, transferring, offering to sell, advertising, providing, shipping, delivering for shipment, offering to deliver for shipment or possessing with the intent to manufacture, distribute, sell, ship or transfer a child sex doll.12345678910111213141516171819 (3) A person commits the offense of importing a child sex doll by knowingly transporting, or causing to be transported, a child sex doll into this Commonwealth by any means with the intent to distribute, sell or transfer the child sex doll to another, whether or not the person has taken actual possession of the child sex doll.(b) Presumption.--In a prosecution for a violation of subsection (a)(2), the possession of two or more child sex dolls shall create a rebuttable presumption that a person intends to commit the offense of trafficking a child sex doll.(c) Exception.--This section shall not apply to a common carrier transporting a container with a child sex doll if the common carrier does not have actual knowledge of the container's contents.(d) Grading.--An offense under subsection (a) constitutes a felony of the third degree.(e) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "child sex doll" means an anatomically correct doll, mannequin or robot that both:(1) Has the features of or features that resemble those of an infant or a child under 12 years of age.(2) Is intended to be used for sexual stimulation or gratification.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1647PN2001 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324